zh-CN: 防护短裤衬垫区域: 全臀部覆盖; 腹股沟（护裆袋）; 腘绳肌; 髋部; 大腿外侧; 坐骨/臀大肌; 尾骨（尾椎）; 大腿; 其他
en: Protective shorts padding zones: Full seat coverage; Groin (cup pocket); Hamstring; Hip; Outer thigh; Sit bones/glutes; Tailbone (coccyx); Thigh; Other
ko: 보호용 쇼츠 패딩 부위: 엉덩이 전체 커버; 사타구니(컵 주머니); 햄스트링; 고관절; 바깥쪽 허벅지; 좌골/둔근; 꼬리뼈(미골); 허벅지; 기타
nl: Type vulling beschermende zones: Volledige bedekking van zitvlak; Kruis (toque-zakje); Hamstring; Heup; Buitenkant dijbeen; Zitbotten/bilspieren; Staartbeen (stuitje); Dijbeen; Overig
sv: Vadderingszoner för skyddsshorts: Fullt säteskydd; Ljumske (ficka för suspensoar); Baksida lår; Höft; Yttre lår; Sittben/sätesmuskler; Svanskota; Lår; Övrigt
hu: Védősort párnázási zónái: Teljes ülepvédelem; Ágyék (szuszpenzortartó); Combhajlító; Csípő; Külső comb; Ülőcsont/Farizom; Farokcsont; Comb; Egyéb
lt-LT: Apsauginių šortų paminkštinimo vietos: Visos sėdimosios dalies apsauga; Kirkšnys (kriauklės kišenė); Šlaunies užpakalinė dalis; Klubai; Išorinė šlaunies dalis; Sėdynkauliai / sėdmenys; Uodegikaulis; Šlaunys; Kita
zh-TW: 防摔褲墊區域: 臀部全包覆; 鼠蹊部 (護襠口袋); 腿後肌; 髖部; 大腿外側; 坐骨/臀肌; 尾骨; 大腿; 其他
el: Ζώνες ενίσχυσης προστατευτικού σορτς: Πλήρης κάλυψη καθίσματος; Βουβωνική χώρα (τσέπη για σπασουάρ); Οπίσθιοι μηριαίοι; Γοφοί; Εξωτερική πλευρά μηρού; Οστά λεκάνης/γλουτοί; Κόκκυγας; Μηρός; Άλλο
pt-BR: Short de proteção, zonas de acolchoamento: Cobertura total do assento; Virilha (bolso para coquilha); Posterior da coxa; Quadril; Parte externa da coxa; Ísquios/glúteos; Cóccix; Coxa; Outro
fi: Suojaavien shortsien pehmusteiden alueet: Koko takamuksen suoja; Nivuset (alasuojatasku); Takareisi; Lonkka; Ulkoreisi; Istuinluut/pakarat; Häntäluu; Reisi; Muu
ru: Зоны защиты шортов: Полная защита таза; Пах (карман для ракушки); Задняя поверхность бедра; Бедро; Внешняя поверхность бедра; Седалищные кости/ягодицы; Копчик; Бедро; Другое
pt-PT: Zonas de acolchoamento dos calções de proteção: Cobertura total do assento; Virilha (bolsa para coquilha); Isquiotibiais; Anca; Parte exterior da coxa; Ossos isquiáticos/glúteos; Cóccix; Coxa; Outra
de: Position der Polsterung an der Protektorenshort: Voller Gesäßschutz; Leiste (Tiefschutz-Tasche); Oberschenkelrückseite; Hüfte; Oberschenkelaußenseite; Sitzbeine/Gesäßmuskulatur; Steißbein (Coccyx); Oberschenkel; Sonstige
hr-HR: Zone podstava zaštitnih hlačica: Potpuna pokrivenost stražnjice; Prepone (džep za štitnik); Stražnja loža; Bok; Vanjska strana bedra; Sjedne kosti / gluteusi; Trtica; Bedro; Ostalo
cs: Zóny vycpávek ochranných šortek: Plné krytí sedací části; Třísla (kapsa na suspenzor); Zadní strana stehen; Boky; Vnější strana stehen; Sedací kosti / hýždě; Kostrč; Stehna; Jiné
sk-SK: Zóny polstrovania ochranných šortiek: Úplné prekrytie sedacej časti; Slabiny (vrecko na suspenzor); Hamstringy; Bedrá; Vonkajšia strana stehna; Sedacie kosti/sedacie svaly; Kostrč; Stehno; Iné
pl: Strefy wypełnienia spodenek ochronnych: Pełne pokrycie pośladków; Krocze (kieszeń na ochraniacz); Uda (tył); Biodra; Zewnętrzna część uda; Kości kulszowe / pośladki; Kość ogonowa; Uda; Inne
it: Zone di spaziatura interna dei pantaloncini protettivi: Copertura completa della seduta; Inguine (tasca per conchiglia); Flessori della coscia; Fianchi; Esterno coscia; Ossa ischiatiche/glutei; Coccige; Coscia; Altro
ja: プロテクトショーツパディングゾーン: シート全体をカバー; 股間 (カップポケット); ハムストリング; ヒップ; 太もも外側; 坐骨/臀部; 尾骨; 太もも; その他
nb: Polstrede soner for beskyttelsesshorts: Full setedekning; Lysk (lomme til susp); Bakside lår; Hofte; Ytre lår; Sittebein/setemuskulatur; Halebein; Lår; Annet
da: Polstringszoner i beskyttelsesshorts: Fuld bagdelsbeskyttelse; Lyske (lomme til skridtbeskytter); Baglår; Hofte; Yderlår; Siddeknogler/balder; Haleben (coccyx); Lår; Andet
th: บริเวณแผ่นรองในกางเกงซับในกันกระแทก: ปกปิดช่วงก้นทั้งหมด; ขาหนีบ (ช่องใส่กระจับ); กล้ามเนื้อแฮมสตริง; สะโพก; ต้นขาด้านนอก; กระดูกเชิงกราน/กล้ามเนื้อก้น; กระดูกก้นกบ; ต้นขา; อื่นๆ
es: Zonas de relleno de los pantalones cortos de protección: Cobertura completa de glúteos; Ingle (bolsillo para copa); Isquiotibiales; Cadera; Parte exterior del muslo; Isquiones/glúteos; Rabadilla (cóccix); Muslo; Otro
fr: Zones de rembourrage des shorts de protection: Couverture complète du fessier; Aine (poche pour coquille); Ischio-jambier; Hanche; Extérieur de la cuisse; Os de l’assise/fessiers; Coccyx; Cuisse; Autre
vi: Vùng đệm của quần short bảo hộ: Che phủ toàn bộ mông; Háng (túi đựng cúp bảo vệ); Cơ đùi sau; Hông; Đùi ngoài; Xương chậu/Cơ mông; Xương cụt; Đùi; Khác
sl-SI: Cone blazinjenja zaščitnih kratkih hlač: Pokritost celotne zadnjice; Dimlje (žep za ščitnik); Zadnja stegna mišica; Boki; Zunanja stran stegna; Sedne kosti/zadnjične mišice; Trtica; Stegno; Drugo
bg-BG: Зони на подплънката на защитни шорти: Пълно покритие на седалището; Слабини (джоб за протектор); Задна част на бедрото; Ханш; Външна част на бедрото; Седалищни кости/мускули; Опашна кост; Бедро; Друго
tr: Koruyucu şort dolgu bölgeleri: Tam oturma alanı koruması; Kasık (kuki cebi); Arka bacak; Kalça; Dış uyluk; Oturma kemikleri/kalça kasları; Kuyruk sokumu (koksiks); Uyluk; Diğer
ro-RO: Zone de căptușire pentru șorțuri de protecție: Acoperire completă a șezutului; Zona inghinală (buzunar pentru cochilie); Mușchii ischiogambieri; Șold; Partea exterioară a coapsei; Oasele bazinului/fese; Coccis; Coapsă; Altele